North Carolina, session 2025, HB676.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million five hundred twenty-four thousand nine hundred
seventy-eight dollars ($1,524,978) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide
a directed grant to the Haywood County School system to be used as follows:
(1) Nine hundred ninety-eight thousand five hundred thirty-eight dollars
($998,538) to install a turf field at Tuscola High School.
(2) Twenty-six thousand four hundred forty dollars ($26,440) to purchase a metal
building for use as a multipurpose locker room at the C.E. Weatherby
Stadium.
(3) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for stadium improvements at Bethel
Middle School.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H676-v-1*